California statutes. Education Code
(c) The contract or transaction is between an auxiliary organization and a corporation in which any member of the board of directors of that auxiliary organization is the owner or holder, directly or indirectly, of 5 percent or more of the outstanding common stock.

(d) A member of the board of directors of an auxiliary organization is interested in a contract or transaction within the meaning of Section 72677, and without first disclosing such interest to the governing board at a public meeting of the board, influences or attempts to influence another member or members of the board to enter into the contract or transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 858, Sec. 2.   Effective August 31, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

72680.

It is unlawful for any person to utilize any information, not a matter of public record, which is received by the person by reason of his or her membership on the board of directors of an auxiliary organization, for personal pecuniary gain, regardless of whether he or she is or is not a member of the board at the time such gain is realized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 858, Sec. 2.   Effective August 31, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

72682.

An auxiliary organization that was in existence on August 31, 1980, shall continue to operate under Article 6 (commencing with Section 72670) of Chapter 6 of Part 45, as it read immediately prior to August 30, 1980, until the time, if any, that the organization is recognized pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 7.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. The Richard McKee Transparency Act of 2011 [72690. - 72701.]

72690.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Access to information concerning the conduct of the people’s business is a necessary and fundamental right of every person in this state.

(b) The auxiliary organizations of a governing board of a community college district and of the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges promote and assist the colleges by engaging in activities that are essential and integral to the mission and purpose of the California Community Colleges.

(c) The auxiliary organizations of a governing board of a community college district and of the
 Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges are legally separate from the California Community Colleges.

(d) Access to records used, owned, or maintained by these auxiliary organizations must be balanced by the need to protect the individual privacy rights of donors and volunteers, and to protect an auxiliary organization’s fiduciary interests.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

72691.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Auxiliary organization” means those entities defined in Sections 72670 and 72670.5.

(b) “Identifiable writing” means any handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating, photographing, photocopying, transmitting by electronic mail or facsimile, and every other means of recording upon any tangible thing, any form of communication or representation, including, but not limited to, letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combinations thereof, and any record thereby created, regardless of the manner in which the record has been
 stored.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

72692.

(a) Records maintained by an auxiliary organization shall be available to the public to inspect or copy at all times during the office hours of the auxiliary organization, except as hereafter provided. The records subject to inspection or copying by the public pursuant to this section shall include any identifiable writing containing information relating to the conduct of the auxiliary organization that is prepared, owned, used, or retained by an auxiliary organization. Any reasonably segregable portion of a record shall be promptly available for inspection and copying after redacting those portions exempt from disclosure by law.

(b) Upon a request for a copy of a record that reasonably describes an
 identifiable record, an auxiliary organization shall make the record promptly available within a reasonable time to any person upon payment of fees covering only the direct cost of duplication, except with respect to records maintained by an auxiliary organization exempt from disclosure by law. Nothing in this article shall be construed to permit an auxiliary organization to delay or obstruct the inspection or copying of public records.

(c) If a member of the public requests to inspect a public record or obtain a copy of a record held by an auxiliary organization, the organization shall assist the person to make a focused and effective request that reasonably describes an identifiable record or records.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

72693.

(a) Upon a written request for a copy or inspection of records, an auxiliary organization shall determine, within 10 calendar days from the receipt of the request, whether the request, in whole or in part, seeks copies of disclosable records maintained by the auxiliary organization and shall notify the requester in writing without undue delay of the determination and the reasons therefor.

(b) (1) In unusual circumstances, the time limit prescribed in this section may be extended by a written notice by the head of the auxiliary organization, or his or her designee, to the person making the request that sets forth the reasons for the extension and the date on which a determination
 is expected to be sent. That notice shall not specify a date that would result in an extension of more than 14 days. When the auxiliary organization sends the determination, and if the auxiliary organization determines that the request seeks disclosable public records, the auxiliary organization shall state the estimated date and time when the records will be made available.

(2) As used in this section, “unusual circumstances” means the following, but only to the extent reasonably necessary to the proper processing of the particular request:

(A) The need to search for and collect the requested records from field facilities or other establishments that are separate from the office processing the request.

(B) The need to search for, collect, and appropriately examine a voluminous amount of separate and distinct records
 that are demanded in a single request.

(C) The need for consultation, which shall be conducted with all practicable speed, with another agency having a substantial interest in the determination of the request or among two or more components of the agency having a substantial subject matter interest therein.

(D) The need to compile data, to write programming language or a computer program, or to construct a computer report to extract data.

(c) An auxiliary organization shall justify withholding a record by demonstrating that the record is exempt from disclosure by law, or that, on the facts of the particular request, the public interest served by not disclosing the record clearly outweighs the public interest served by disclosure of the record.

(d) A
 response to a written request for inspection or copies of public records that includes a determination that the request is denied, in whole or in part, shall be in writing and shall set forth the names and titles or positions of each person responsible for the denial.

(e) This article shall not limit access to a public record on the basis of the purpose for which the record is being requested, if the record is otherwise subject to disclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

72694.

(a) Unless otherwise prohibited by law, an auxiliary organization that has information that constitutes an identifiable record not exempt from disclosure pursuant to this chapter that is in an electronic format shall make that record available in an electronic format when requested by any person and, when applicable, shall comply with both of the following:

(1) An auxiliary organization shall make an electronic record available in the electronic format in which it holds the information.

(2) An auxiliary organization shall provide a copy of an electronic record in the format requested if the requested format is one that has been used by
 the auxiliary organization to create copies for its own use or for provision to other entities or persons. The cost of duplication shall be limited to the direct cost of producing a copy of a record in an electronic format.

(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the requester shall bear the cost of producing a copy of the record, including the cost to construct a record, and the cost of programming and computer services necessary to produce a copy of the record if either of the following applies:

(1) In order to comply with the provisions of subdivision (a), an auxiliary organization would be required to produce a copy of an electronic record and the record is one that is produced only at otherwise regularly scheduled intervals.

(2) The request would require data compilation, extraction, or programming
 to produce the record.

(c) If a request is for a record in a nonelectronic format, and the record is also available in an electronic format, an auxiliary organization may inform the requester that the record is available in an electronic format.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to do any of the following:

(1) Require an auxiliary organization to reconstruct a record in an electronic format if the auxiliary organization no longer has the record available in an electronic format.

(2) Permit an auxiliary organization to make a record available only in an electronic format.

(3) Require an auxiliary organization to release an electronic record in the electronic form in which it is
 held by the auxiliary organization if its release would jeopardize or compromise the security or integrity of the original record, or of any proprietary software with which it is maintained.

(4) Permit public access to records held by an auxiliary organization to which access is otherwise restricted by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

72695.

Nothing in this article shall require an auxiliary organization to disclose information that is exempt from disclosure pursuant to an exemption set forth in Section 7922.000 of the Government Code or in any provision listed in Section 7920.505 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 76.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

72696.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the following records maintained by an auxiliary organization shall not be subject to disclosure:

(1) Information that would disclose the identity of a donor, prospective donor, or volunteer.

(2) Personal financial information, estate planning information, and gift planning information of a donor, prospective donor, or volunteer.

(3) Personal information related to a donor’s private trusts or a donor’s private annuities administered by an auxiliary organization.

(4) Information related to fundraising plans, fundraising research, and solicitation strategies to the extent that these activities are not already protected under Section 99040, Title 5 (commencing with Section 3426) of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Civil Code, Section 1060 of the Evidence Code, or Section 7927.705 of the Government Code.

(5) The identity of students and alumni to the extent that this information is already protected under state and federal statutes applicable to the California Community Colleges. This paragraph shall not apply to a part-time or full-time employee of the auxiliary organization, or to a student who participates in a legislative body of a student body organization that operates on a campus of a California community college.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not be construed to exempt from disclosure records that contain information regarding any of the following:

(1) The amount and date of a donation.

(2) Any donor-designated use or purpose of a donation.

(3) Any other donor-imposed restrictions on the use of a donation.

(4) (A) The identity of a donor who, in any fiscal year, makes a gift or gifts, in a quid pro quo arrangement, where either the value of the benefit received is in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or the benefit would be impermissible under state or federal law. In these circumstances, records
 pertaining to the gift or gifts maintained by an auxiliary organization that would otherwise be exempt from disclosure under subdivision (a) shall be disclosed.

(B) Annually, on January 1, the monetary threshold set forth in subparagraph (A) shall be adjusted upward or downward to reflect the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index, as calculated by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, rounded off to the nearest one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(5) Self-dealing transactions, including, but not limited to, loans of money or property, or material financial interests of or between auxiliary officers or directors and an auxiliary organization, as set forth in Sections 5233 and 5236 of the Corporations Code. In these circumstances, records pertaining to the
 self-dealing transactions maintained by an auxiliary organization that would otherwise be exempt from disclosure under subdivision (a) shall be disclosed.

(6) Any instance in which a volunteer or donor of a gift is awarded, within five years of the date of the service or gift, a contract from the university or auxiliary organization that was not subject to competitive bidding. In these circumstances, records pertaining to the service or gift maintained by an auxiliary organization that would otherwise be exempt from disclosure under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be disclosed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 77.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

72696.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law, trade secrets, as defined in Section 3426.1 of the Civil Code, shall not be subject to disclosure. This information shall be redacted from auxiliary organization records before disclosure.

(b) For purposes of this section, “trade secrets” means information, including a formula, pattern, compilation, program, device, method, technique, or process, that does both of the following:

(1) Derives independent economic value, actual or potential, from not being generally known to the public or to other persons who can obtain economic value from its disclosure or use.

(2) Is the subject of efforts that are reasonable under the circumstances to maintain its secrecy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

72697.

Any person may institute proceedings for injunctive or declarative relief or writ of mandate in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce his or her right to inspect or to receive a copy of any record or class of records maintained by an auxiliary organization under this article. The times for responsive pleadings and for hearings in these proceedings shall be set by the judge of the court with the object of securing a decision as to these matters at the earliest possible time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

72698.

(a) Whenever it is made to appear by verified petition to the superior court of the county where the records or some part thereof are situated that certain records maintained by an auxiliary organization are being improperly withheld from a member of the public, the court shall order the officer or person charged with withholding the records to disclose the record or show cause why he or she should not do so. The court shall decide the case after examining the record in camera, if permitted by subdivision (b) of Section 915 of the Evidence Code, papers filed by the parties, and any oral argument and additional evidence as the court may allow.

(b) If the court finds that an auxiliary organization
 official’s decision to refuse disclosure is not justified under this article, he or she shall order the official to make the record public. If the judge determines that the official was justified in refusing to make the record public, he or she shall return the item to the official without disclosing its content with an order supporting the decision refusing disclosure.

(c) An order of the court, either directing disclosure by an auxiliary organization or supporting the decision of the auxiliary organization official refusing disclosure, is not a final judgment or order within the meaning of Section 904.1 of the Code of Civil Procedure from which an appeal may be taken, but shall be immediately reviewable by petition to the appellate court for the issuance of an extraordinary writ. Upon entry of any order pursuant to this section, a party shall, in order to obtain review of the order, file a petition within 20 days after service upon him or her
 of a written notice of entry of the order, or within such further time not exceeding an additional 20 days as the trial court may for good cause allow. If the notice is served by mail, the period within which to file the petition shall be increased by five days. A stay of an order or judgment shall not be granted unless the petitioning party demonstrates it will otherwise sustain irreparable damage and probable success on the merits. Any person who fails to obey the order of the court shall be cited to show cause why he or she is not in contempt of court.

(d) The court shall award court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to the plaintiff should the plaintiff prevail in litigation filed pursuant to this section. The costs and reasonable attorney’s fees shall be paid by the auxiliary organization of which the official is a member or employee and shall not become a personal liability of the auxiliary organization official. If the court finds
 that the plaintiff’s case is clearly frivolous, the court shall award court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to the auxiliary organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

72699.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except as provided for in subdivision (c), whenever an auxiliary organization discloses a record it maintains that is otherwise exempt from this article, this disclosure shall constitute a waiver of the exemptions specified in this article.

(b) For purposes of this section, “auxiliary organization” includes a member, agent, volunteer, or officer of the auxiliary organization acting within the scope of his or her affiliation with the organization.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to the following disclosures:

(1) Disclosures made to a donor or prospective donor with regard to that
 donor’s donation or prospective donation to an auxiliary organization.

(2) Disclosures made to a volunteer or prospective volunteer with respect to that volunteer’s services being provided to the auxiliary organization.

(3) Disclosures made through other legal proceedings or as otherwise required by law.

(4) Disclosures within the scope of a disclosure required by law that limits disclosure of specified writings to certain purposes.

(5) Disclosures described in subdivision (a) of Section 72696 to an auditor conducting an audit.

(6) Disclosures described in subdivision (a) of Section 72696 to a bank or similar financial institution in the course of ordinary financial transactions, or in
 response to a request from the bank or other financial institution relating to the ordinary delivery of financial services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 41.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

72700.

Any provision in a contract entered into after the effective date of this article between an auxiliary organization and another party that would prevent the disclosure of information required to be disclosed pursuant to this article is void and unenforceable, and such a provision shall not justify a failure to comply with the requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

72701.

This article shall not apply to any records subject to a request made pursuant to the California Public Records Act, as set forth in Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 78.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 46. DISTRICT REORGANIZATION OR FORMATION [74000. - 74296.]



  CHAPTER 1. Legislative Intent and Definitions [74000. - 74016.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Intent and Purpose [74000. - 74001.]

74000.

The Legislature hereby declares as its policy that all of the territory of the state shall be included within a community college district, except that territory located within a county where the county residents accounted for fewer than 350 units of average daily attendance in the state’s community colleges during the preceding fiscal year. The territory located within such a county may be included within a community college district pursuant to the procedures prescribed by Article 2 (commencing with Section 74130) of Chapter 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 361.)
-------------------------------------------

74001.

On and after January 1, 1983, the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 4000) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 and Articles 2 and 3 (commencing with Section 35720) of Chapter 4 of Part 21 shall apply to actions to reorganize community college districts, as may be applicable, except that whenever any reference is made to the State Board of Education in those provisions the reference shall be deemed, for the purpose of community college district reorganization, to be the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 362.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [74012. - 74016.]

74012.

(a) “Component school district” means a high school or unified school district which is included within a community college district.

(b) “Nondistrict territory” means a high school or unified school district which is not included within any community college district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74013.

“Former district” means a district which has been wholly included in another district. The boundaries of a former district are those of the district as it existed immediately prior to being wholly included in another district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74014.

An “action to reorganize districts” means an action to transfer all or part of a district to another district, to annex nondistrict territory to a district, to form a new district, or to otherwise alter the boundaries of a community college district, or any combination of such actions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74015.

“County committee” means the county committee on school district organization, organized and acting as provided for in Article 1 (commencing with Section 4000) of Chapter 1 of Part 3, or the county board of education, organized and acting as provided for in Article 2 (commencing with Section 4020) of Chapter 1 of Part 3, and performing the duties as described in Articles 2 and 3 (commencing with Section 35720) of Chapter 4 of Part 21.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74016.

“Affected districts” means any component school district or nondistrict territory within the territory to be transferred, annexed, or formed, or both, or any community college district subject to an action to reorganize districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 964, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Initiation of Petition and Local Review Procedures [74100. - 74180.]



  ARTICLE 1. Transfer [74100. - 74110.]

74100.

An action to reorganize one or more districts by the transfer of territory to another district is initiated upon the filing of a petition with the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction. A petition to reorganize districts by the transfer of territory to another district shall be signed by either of the following:

(a) Where the petition is to transfer territory currently located in one district, at least 25 percent of the registered voters residing in the territory proposed to be transferred shall sign the petition. Where the petition is to transfer territory currently located in two or more districts, at least 25 percent of the registered voters residing in the territory proposed to be transferred in each district shall sign the petition.

(b) A majority of the members of each of the governing boards of the districts which would be affected by the proposed reorganization.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74102.

In any petition to reorganize districts by transfer, there shall be designated no more than three of the petitioners as chief petitioners for the purpose of receiving notice of any public hearings to be held on the petition.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74103.

The persons securing the signatures to a petition of electors to reorganize districts shall attach thereto an affidavit that all persons who signed the petition did so in the presence of the affiant and that each signature is a genuine signature of the person whose name it purports to be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74104.

Upon receipt of the petition, the county superintendent of schools shall transmit a copy of the petition to the board of governors. The county superintendent of schools, within 30 days after the petition for reorganization is filed, shall examine the petition and, if he or she finds it to be sufficient and signed as required by law, shall transmit the petition simultaneously to the county committee, the governing board of each affected district, and the board of governors.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, if the transfer involves a minor change in district boundaries, defined as a transfer of territory involving less than 5 percent of the adult population of the district from which the transfer is being made, the petition may be transmitted directly to the county board of supervisors by the county superintendent of schools, without submission to the county committee on school district organization. The procedure specified in this paragraph may not be utilized more than once every five years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

74105.

Within 90 days after receipt of the petition, the county committee shall hold one or more public hearings on the petition at a regular or special meeting in each of the districts affected by the petition. Notice of the public hearing shall be given at least 10 days in advance of the date of the hearing to the chief petitioners, to the governing board of all districts affected by the proposed transfer, the board of governors and to all other persons requesting notice of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

74106.

(a) The county committee may add to the petition any appropriate provisions which were not included in the petition as filed, and may amend any provision which was so included.

(b) At least 10 days before the public hearing on the petition, the county committee shall make available to the public, the governing boards affected by the petition, and the board of governors, a description of the petition and a report which includes a description or analysis of all the following:

(1) The rights of the employees in the affected districts to continued employment.

(2) The financial impact of the proposed change on each affected district.

(3) Whether the districts involved will be governed, in part, by provisions of a city charter and, if so, in what way.

(4) A description of the territory affected.

(5) A description of how the property, obligations, and bonded indebtedness of existing districts will be divided.

(6) Whether the reorganization will significantly affect racial or ethnic composition of districts.

(7) Determination of impact of proposed change upon boards of trustees.

(8) A draft statement of the terms of the agreement regarding all conditions of the transfer, when applicable, for consideration by governing boards of affected districts.

(9) Whether the change is compatible with the district master plan of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

74107.

Within 90 days after affording the public an opportunity to comment on the petition, the report, and the recommendations included in the report, the county committee shall forward a copy of the petition and the report documents to each district governing board and the board of governors for review. No transfer shall be made unless a majority of the members of the governing board of the district to which the territory is to be transferred sign a statement agreeing to all conditions of the transfer at a public meeting conducted for that purpose. Upon completion of the public meeting, the receiving governing board shall return the petition and statement of agreement, together with a notice of action, to the county committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 374.)
-------------------------------------------

74108.

The county committee may approve a petition only if either of the following conditions are met:

(a) The petition is to transfer uninhabited territory from one district to another and the owner of the territory, or a majority of the owners of the territory, and the governing board of the receiving district involved in the transfer consent to the transfer.

(b) The petition is to transfer inhabited territory and all the following conditions are satisfied.

(1) The governing board of the receiving district has consented to all conditions of transfer by an agreement signed by a majority of the members of the board.

(2) The county committee finds that:

(A) The transfer will not result in any increased cost to the state.

(B) The transfer will not result in a reduction in state aid to community college districts not party to the petition.

(C) The reallocation of local property tax revenues has been accurately determined and will be appropriately transferred.

(D) The transfer will not significantly affect the racial or ethnic composition of the districts affected.

(E) The transfer will not decrease educational opportunities for residents of all districts involved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74109.

Whenever a county committee approves a petition, within 10 days it shall transmit a copy of the approved petition, together with any related information or recommendations, to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 376.)
-------------------------------------------

74110.

Whenever the county committee rejects a petition, it shall notify the chief petitioners and the board of governors of its action and provide in writing the basis for rejection.

The county committee need not accept a new petition on the same territory filed within 12 months of its decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 377.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Annexation [74130. - 74140.]

74130.

Provisions of this article shall apply only to petitions to include in an existing community college district a high school or unified school district which is contiguous to that community college district and presently not in any community college district subject to provisions of Section 74000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74131.

An action to annex nondistrict territory to an existing community college district is initiated upon the filing with the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction of a petition signed by any one of the following:

(a) At least 25 percent of the registered voters residing in the nondistrict territory to be annexed. If two or more high school or unified school districts are involved, the petition shall be signed by at least 25 percent of the registered voters in each school district.

(b) A majority of the members of the governing board of any high school or unified school district proposing annexation.

(c) A majority of the members of the governing board of the community college district which would receive the annexed territory under the proposal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74132.

(a) A petition initiated under subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 74131 shall be filed with the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the nondistrict territory.

(b) A petition initiated under subdivision (c) of Section 74131 shall be filed with the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the territory in which the community college district is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 379.)
-------------------------------------------

74133.

The provisions of Sections 74102 and 74103 shall apply to a petition for annexation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74134.

Upon receipt of the petition the county superintendent of schools shall transmit a copy of the petition to the board of governors. Within 30 days after the petition for reorganization is filed, the county superintendent shall examine the petition and, if he or she finds it to be sufficient and signed as required by law, shall transmit the petition simultaneously to each of the following:

(a) The governing board and district superintendent of each district affected by the proposed annexation.

(b) The county superintendent and county committee of each county which has jurisdiction over any district affected by the proposed annexation.

(c) The board of governors.

When applicable, Article 4 (commencing with Section 74180) shall also control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 381.)
-------------------------------------------

74135.

(a) The county committee may add to the petition any appropriate provisions which were not included in the petition as filed and may amend any provision which was so included.

(b) At least 10 days before the public hearing on the petition, the county committee shall make available to the public, to the governing boards affected by the petition, and to the board of governors a description of the petition and a report which includes a description or analysis of the impact of the proposed change upon the following:

(1) Funding of each affected unified or high school and community college district, including determination of level and sources of local property or special taxes to be levied for general purposes of the recipient community college district.

The property tax contribution to the district shall not be less than the proportion that the tax levied in the 1977–78 fiscal year in the territory affected pursuant to former Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 2100) of Part 2 bore to the total property tax levied in that territory in the 1977–78 fiscal year.

Alternative sources of local tax contribution to the recipient district, as may be permitted by law, shall be included in the committee’s report.

(2) Existing property, obligations, and bonded indebtedness.

(3) Racial or ethnic composition of the recipient district.

(4) Governing board of recipient district.

(5) County district master plan.

(6) Any matter considered significant by the county committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 382.)
-------------------------------------------

74136.

Within 90 days after affording the public an opportunity to comment on the petition, the report, and the recommendations included in the report, the county committee shall forward a copy of the petition and the report to each affected governing board and the board of governors for review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 383.)
-------------------------------------------

74137.

The governing board of the district to which the territory is to be transferred shall set a date for a public hearing on the petition which shall be within 60 days of the receipt of the petition forwarded pursuant to Section 74136, and the county superintendent shall notify the chief petitioners of the times and places of the hearings, where appropriate. At the hearings, interested persons shall be given an opportunity to present their views on the petition. The governing board of the receiving district then shall either approve or deny the petition. No annexation shall be made unless a majority of the members of the governing board of the receiving district sign a statement agreeing to all conditions of the transfer at the hearings. Upon completion of the hearings, the governing board of the receiving district shall return the petition, together with a notice of action, to the county committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 964, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74138.

The county committee may approve the petition only if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The governing board of the receiving district has consented to all conditions of annexation by an agreement signed by a majority of the members of the board.

(b) The county committee finds that:

(1) The annexation will not result in any increased cost to the state.

(2) The annexation will not result in a reduction in state aid to community college districts not party to the petition.
